Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-207
Research and extension center west of 102nd meridian; object.

The object of the research and extension center referred to in section 85-206 shall be to determine the adaptability of the arid and semiarid portions of Nebraska to agriculture, horticulture, and forestry, such as the producing of grain, grasses, root crops, and fruits of kinds commonly grown in the same latitude in other states, and the most economical methods of producing such crops with and without irrigation.

Laws 1909, c. 144, § 4, p. 503;

R.S.1913, § 7140;

C.S.1922, § 6790;

C.S.1929, § 85-206;

R.S.1943, § 85-207;

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 77.